Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Methods of Voting

117.105.
Purchase
or lease of voting systems.

The legislative body of any county, urban-county government, charter county, consolidated local government, or unified local government shall purchase or lease, from available funds or from the proceeds of bonds which may be issued for that purpose, voting systems for use in primaries, regular elections, and special elections.

Any voting system purchased, leased, or otherwise acquired by the legislative body of any county, urban-county government, charter county, consolidated local government, or unified local government on or after June 29, 2021 shall comply with the requirements of KRS

117.125

.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a county board of elections from performing maintenance on voting equipment that has been previously certified by the State Board of Elections and is in use on June 29, 2021.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 24; 2021 ch. 197, § 16, effective June 29, 2021.

117.115.
Power to select type and make of voting system or e-poll book product.

The legislative body of any county, urban-county government, charter county, consolidated local government, or unified local government may select, in its discretion, any type and make of voting system or e-poll book product that complies with the specifications and requirements of this chapter. The legislative body may employ engineers and other skilled persons to advise and aid in the selection of voting systems or e-poll book products and in determining compliance with the specifications and requirements of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 25; 2021 ch. 197, § 17, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 172, § 4, effective July 14, 2022.

117.125.
Specifications and features required for approval.

No voting system or voting equipment shall be approved for use after January 1, 2024, by the State Board of Elections, either upon initial examination or reexamination, and no voting equipment or voting system shall be purchased after July 14, 2022, unless the system and equipment has been certified under KRS

117.379

and is so constructed that it shall:

Ensure secrecy to the voter in the act of voting so that no person can see or know for whom any other voter has voted or is voting, except for those voters requiring assistance under KRS

117.255

;

Permit votes to be cast for any candidate entitled to have his or her name printed upon the ballots at any primary, regular election, or special election, and for or against any public question entitled to be placed upon the ballots;

Except at a primary, permit a voter to vote for all the candidates of one (1) party or for one (1) or more candidates of every party having candidates entitled to be voted for, or for one (1) or more independent, political organization, or political group candidates;

Permit a voter to vote for as many persons for an office as the voter is lawfully entitled to vote for, and no more;

Prevent a voter from voting for more persons for any office than the voter is entitled to vote for, and from voting for the same person, or for or against the same question, more than once;

Permit a voter to vote for or against any question the voter may have the right to vote on, but no other;

Provide for a nonpartisan ballot;

Be capable of being adjusted for use in a primary so that a voter may not vote for any person except those seeking nomination as candidates of the voter’s party, as candidates for a nonpartisan office, or as candidates for an office of the Court of Justice;

Permit each voter to vote for all the candidates for presidential electors of any party by one (1) operation;

Permit each voter to vote, in any regular or special election, for any person for whom the voter desires to vote whose name does not appear upon the ballot by providing a method of write-in voting;

Be safe, efficient, and accurate in the conduct of elections, and correctly register and accurately count all votes cast for each person, and for or against each public question;

Provide each voter an opportunity to verify votes recorded on the permanent paper ballot, either visually or using assistive voting technology, by producing a voter-verified paper audit trail;

Provide each voter an opportunity to change votes or correct any error before the voter’s ballot is cast and counted; and

Provide a voter who spoils his or her ballot another ballot as provided under this chapter;

Use an individual, discrete, permanent, paper ballot cast by the voter for tabulating purposes;

Preserve the paper ballot as an official record available for use in any audit or recount;

Be suitably designed for the purpose used, constructed of a durable material, and safely transportable;

Be capable of determining whether the voting equipment has been unlocked and operated or adjusted in any manner after once being locked;

Have a public counter with a register which is visible from the outside of the counter or device that will show at all times during an election how many persons have voted;

Have a protective cumulative counter indicating the number of votes cast for each person, and the votes cast for or against each public question which cannot be seen, reset, or tampered with without unlocking a covering device by a key or other security apparatus that cannot unlock any other part of the equipment, and which prevents changes to the cumulative counter once the system has been put into operation on the day of any election;

Provide for the tabulating of votes at the precinct as required under KRS

117.275

;

Provide locks or other security apparatus by which the operation of the voting equipment may be locked before the time for opening the polls and after the time for closing the polls;

Permit a voter to readily learn the method of operating it, to expeditiously cast a vote for all candidates and on all questions of the voter’s choice, and when operated properly, register and record correctly and accurately every vote cast;

Bear a number or other unique designation that will distinguish it from any other voting equipment or voting system;

Produce a real-time audit log record for the voting system, and produce a paper record with a manual audit capacity which shall be available as an official record for any recount conducted related to any primary or election in which the system is used;

Be accessible for individuals with impairments, including nonvisual accessibility for the blind or visually impaired, in a manner that provides the same opportunity for access and participation, including privacy and independence, as for other voters;

Prohibit voting equipment that tabulates or aggregates votes used in official results from connecting to any network, including the Internet, or communicating with any device external to the voting system;

Meet or exceed the standards for a voting system established by the Election Assistance Commission, as amended from time to time, and those approved under KRS

117.379

; and

Meet such other requirements as may be established by the State Board of Elections in administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A to reflect changes in technology to ensure the integrity and security of voting systems.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 26; 1976, ch. 54, § 21, effective March 10, 1976; 2021 ch. 197, § 18, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 87, § 12, effective April 7, 2022; 2022 ch. 219, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022). This statute was amended by 2022 Ky. Acts chs. 87 and 219, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

117.135.
Custody and security of voting equipment.

When voting equipment is acquired by any county, the voting equipment shall:

Be immediately placed in the custody of the county clerk;

Remain in the county clerk’s custody at all times except when in use during in-person absentee voting, during an election, or when in the custody of a court or court officer during contest proceedings;

Be properly protected and preserved by the county clerk from damage or unnecessary deterioration;

Be protected by the county clerk from any unauthorized tampering with the voting equipment; and

Be secured and locked by the county clerk to ensure that access is restricted to only members of the county board of elections or other persons as authorized by law.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 27; 2021 ch. 197, § 19, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 87, § 13, effective April 7, 2022; 2022 ch. 219, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022). This statute was amended by 2022 Ky. Acts chs. 87 and 219, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The fiscal court has no authority or control over
the custody and handling of the voting machines as this is the basic responsibility
of the county clerk.

OAG 84-209

.

117.145.
Preparation of ballot labels, absentee ballots, voter affirmations, election official affirmations, federal provisional ballots, and paper ballots — Provision for write-in votes.

At least forty-five (45) days before any special election, and at least fifty (50) days before any primary or regular election, the county clerk of each county shall cause to be printed and ready for use ballots listing each candidate who, and each question which, is entitled to be voted upon in such primary or election. The ballots shall be printed on clear white paper or other material, in black ink, in plain, clear type clearly legible to a person with normal vision, and shall include the necessary party designations. The quality of the paper and the size of the ballots shall be established by the State Board of Elections in administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A.

Each county clerk shall have printed a sufficient number of paper absentee ballots, voter affirmations, and election official affirmations. The ballots shall be consecutively numbered and the county board shall keep a record, by number, of all absentee ballots used for any of the purposes listed in this subsection.

Each county clerk shall have printed a sufficient number of federal provisional ballots, which, except for the candidates listed, shall have the same form as the absentee ballots. A federal provisional ballot shall indicate that the ballot is a federal provisional ballot. The federal provisional ballot stubs shall be consecutively numbered, and the county board of elections shall keep a record, by number, of all federal provisional ballots used for votes cast by provisional voters in federal elections.

Each county clerk shall have printed a sufficient number of paper ballots to be used for voting for any primary or election. The methods of securing the integrity of the ballots from the time of certification of each candidate and each question to be voted upon in any primary or election until the conclusion of the primary or election, and the method of tracking all voted, unvoted, or spoiled ballots shall be established by the State Board of Elections in administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A.

No later than the Friday preceding a special or regular election, the county clerk shall equip the voting equipment with the necessary supplies for the purpose of write-in votes. The county clerk shall also provide a pencil, pen, or ballot marking device for the voting equipment for write-in purposes.

If supplemental paper ballots have been approved as provided in KRS

118.215

, the county clerk shall cause to be printed a sufficient number of supplemental paper ballots for the registered voters of each precinct. The supplemental paper ballots shall have stubs which are numbered consecutively.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 28; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 3; 1984, ch. 44, § 4, effective March 2, 1984; 1984, ch. 185, § 8, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 470, § 12, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 23, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 296, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 2020 ch. 89, § 11, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 20, effective June 29, 2021.

117.155.
Duties of county clerk relating to voting equipment.

The county clerk shall place all ballots required to be placed upon voting equipment in such a manner as will most nearly conform to the plan of arrangement prescribed by the Secretary of State under KRS

118.215

. The county clerk shall then see that the counters referred to in KRS 117.125(17) and (18) are set at zero, and shall lock the operating device and mechanism and the devices protecting the counters and ballots, which shall then be covered with a tamper-resistant seal. The county clerk shall then enter in an appropriate book, opposite the number of each precinct the distinguishing number of the voting equipment or the unique designation to be used in that precinct.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 29; 1976, ch. 247, § 10; 2021 ch. 197, § 21, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 87, § 14, effective April 7, 2022.

117.165.
Examination of voting equipment by county board — Approval — Who may be present during examination.

Upon completing the preparation of the voting systems, including any voting equipment in operation, in accordance with KRS

117.155

, and not later than the Thursday preceding the day of the election, the county clerk shall notify the members of the county board of elections that the voting equipment is ready for use. The county board of elections shall thereupon convene at the office of the county clerk, not later than the Friday preceding the day of the election, and examine the voting equipment to determine whether the requirements of KRS

117.155

have been met. The county board of elections shall publish notice, in accordance with KRS 424.130(1)(d), at least twenty-four (24) hours in advance of the time when the voting equipment is to be examined by the board. If found in proper order, the members of the county board of elections shall endorse their approval in the book in which the county clerk has entered the numbers or the unique designation of the voting equipment opposite the numbers of the precincts. The county clerk shall then deliver all of the keys to the voting equipment to the county board of elections who shall give a receipt for the keys. Not later than one (1) hour before the time set for the opening of the polls, the board shall deliver all election supplies including the precinct list, tabulation sheets, and the key to the device covering the registering counters and other keys necessary for the operation of the voting equipment in registering votes, to the election officers of the precinct in which the voting equipment is being used, who shall give the board a receipt of the keys. The keys shall remain in the possession of the county board of elections.

Not later than four (4) business days preceding the date set to conduct excused in-person absentee voting in accordance with KRS

117.076

, the county clerk shall notify the members of the county board of elections that the voting equipment designated for use during in-person absentee voting are ready for use. The board shall thereupon convene at the office of the county clerk, not later than three (3) business days preceding the date set to conduct excused in-person absentee voting, and examine the voting equipment to determine whether the requirements of KRS

117.155

have been met. The county board of elections shall publish notice, in accordance with KRS 424.130(1)(d), at least twenty-four (24) hours in advance of the time when the absentee voting equipment is to be examined by the board. If found in proper order, the members of the county board of elections shall endorse their approval in the book in which the county clerk has entered the unique designation or the identification number of the voting equipment designated for use during in-person absentee voting.

Any candidate, one (1) representative of each political party having candidates to be voted for at the election, and representatives of the news media may be present when the examination of the voting equipment is made by the county board of elections.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 30; 1982, ch. 394, § 13, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 296, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 79, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; 2021 ch. 197, § 22, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 87, § 15, effective April 7, 2022.

117.175.
Instruction cards.

The county clerk shall, with the county attorney, prepare a sufficient number of instruction cards containing instructions as to the proper method of voting by the use of the voting equipment, and instructions as to the proper method of casting a write-in vote. For federal provisional ballots and supplemental paper ballots, if approved as provided in KRS

118.215

, the instruction cards shall indicate the offices, candidates, and questions which will appear on the federal provisional or supplemental paper ballots, the offices that will appear on the federal provisional or supplemental ballot, the instructions for marking and depositing the federal provisional or supplemental paper ballots, instructions for filling out the federal provisional or supplemental ballot, and instructions on how to properly execute the voter affirmations. The instruction cards shall be examined and approved by the county board of elections at the time the voting equipment is examined and approved. The instruction cards shall be delivered to each election clerk by the county clerk at the time that other election supplies are delivered and the election clerk shall post the instruction card at the polling place.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 31; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 4; 2020 ch. 89, § 12, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 23, effective June 29, 2021.

117.185.
Election
officers, instruction and compensation. [Repealed.]

117.187.
Training by State Board of Elections regarding election laws for state and county officials — Training and compensation by county board of elections for election officers and certified challengers.

The State Board of Elections shall regularly provide special training regarding the election laws and methods of enforcement to all members of county boards of elections, county attorneys, Commonwealth’s attorneys, and certain members of the Department of Kentucky State Police.

The county board of elections shall provide special training before each primary, regular election, and any special election to all election officers, alternates, and certified challengers regarding their duties and the penalties for failure to perform. Election officers, including alternates, and certified challengers shall attend the training session, unless excused by the county board of elections for reason of illness or other emergency. Any person who fails to attend a training session without being excused shall be prohibited from serving as an election officer or challenger for a period of five (5) years. The training provided by the county board of elections shall include but not be limited to the following:

Operation of the voting equipment, and voting system as applicable;

Posting of necessary signs and notices at the polling place;

Voter assistance;

Maintaining precinct rosters;

Confirmation of a voter’s identity;

Challenge of a voter;

Completing changes of address or name at the polling place;

Qualifications for voting in a primary;

Electioneering and exit polling;

Write-in voting procedures;

Persons who may be in the voting room;

Election violations and penalties;

Assistance which may be provided by law enforcement officers;

Election reports;

Disability awareness;

Provisional voting and provisional absentee voting;

Election emergency contingency plan;

Elections, voting equipment, and voting systems security plan;

Proof of identification; and

Information concerning the secure online portal to request a mail-in absentee ballot.

The county attorney or the county attorney’s designee may attend the training session for election officers to assist in explaining the duties and penalties for failure to perform.

Compensation in the minimum amount of ten dollars ($10) for reimbursement of actual expenses shall be paid by the county to the election officers for attending the training session.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 341, § 12, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 288, § 50, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 394, § 15, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 243, § 10, effective April 1, 1998; 2005, ch. 71, § 3, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 7, § 2, effective March 8, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 158, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 176, § 6, effective July 15, 2010; 2020 ch. 89, § 13, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 24, effective June 29, 2021.

117.195.
Delivery of equipment to clerks — Arrangement in voting place — Voting supplies — County clerk to take receipt and retain keys to all ballot boxes and ballot receptacles.

At least one (1) hour prior to the opening of the polls, the county clerk shall deliver the voting equipment, with the operating device and mechanism and the device covering the registering counters securely locked, to the clerk of the precinct in which it is to be used, and shall take a receipt indicating the distinguishing number or the unique designation of the voting equipment. The clerk of the precinct shall cause any voting equipment to be arranged in the voting place so that the front of the equipment, on which the ballots appear, if applicable, and the operating devices, will not be visible, when being operated, to any person other than the voter.

In polling places in which voting equipment for multiple precincts are located, the county clerk shall post a sign near the voting equipment identifying the precinct for which the voting equipment has been designated.

For federal provisional ballots, and supplemental paper ballots if approved as provided in KRS

118.215

, the county clerk shall, at least one (1) hour prior to the opening of the polls, deliver or confirm that there is available:

A sufficient number of ballots, and supplemental paper ballots if approved, for the registered voters of each precinct;

A sufficient number of voting booths for voting federal provisional ballots, and supplemental paper ballots if approved;

A sufficient amount of string and rubber stamps for marking “Spoiled” and “Unused” ballots;

A locked ballot box or receptacle for federal provisional ballots, and a separate locked ballot box for supplemental paper ballots if approved, for each precinct; and

A sufficient number of federal provisional voter ballots, voter affirmations, and election official affirmations.

The county clerk shall take a receipt for the number of federal provisional ballots, and supplemental paper ballots if approved, issued and the ballot boxes or ballot receptacles for each precinct. The county clerk shall retain the keys to all ballot boxes and ballot receptacles.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 33; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 5; 1990, ch. 48, § 24, effective July 13, 1990; 2020 ch. 89, § 14, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 25, effective June 29, 2021.

117.205.
Examination by election officers — Correction of defects — Reserve voting equipment.

Before the polls are open, and before permitting any person to vote on the day of the election, the election officers shall examine the voting equipment to ascertain whether it has been operated since the counters referred to in KRS 117.125(17) and (18) were set at zero, and to ascertain whether the ballots are arranged as previously specified. If the voting equipment indicates that it has been operated or if the ballots are not properly arranged, the officers shall not unlock the operating device or mechanism, but shall immediately secure the attendance of the county clerk and one (1) member of the county board of elections other than the county clerk, who shall reset the counters at zero and relock the device covering the counters, or properly arrange the ballots, as the case may be, in the presence of the election officers. If the attendance of members of the board of elections cannot be obtained before the opening of the polls or within one (1) hour thereafter, the election officers shall notify the county clerk of the foregoing facts and obtain from the county clerk reserve voting equipment, and proceed to conduct the election. Any reserve voting equipment shall have been certified for use at the election by the county board of elections and prepared for use at the election by the election officers in the precinct in the same manner as the original voting equipment was prepared for the election. The voting equipment found to have been so operated shall be returned immediately to the custody of the county clerk, whose duty it shall be to promptly repair same so that it may be used as reserve voting equipment in the election if needed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 34; 1990, ch. 48, § 25, effective July 13, 1990; 2021 ch. 197, § 26, effective June 29, 2021.

117.215.
Procedure when equipment no longer operates during election — Counting of votes — Backup voting equipment or paper ballots for emergency use.

If, during the conduct of an election, voting equipment, or any part of a voting system, no longer operates in a manner that will comply with the provisions of this chapter, the election officers shall lock or seal the voting equipment to prevent further voting thereon and record the numbers shown by the public counter. Then the election officers shall secure from the county clerk reserve voting equipment, prepared and made ready for use as provided in KRS

117.205

, and proceed to conduct the election. When the polls are closed both the original and reserve voting equipment shall be examined and the votes thereon registered shall be counted as provided in KRS

117.275

, and the aggregate number of votes cast on all voting equipment for each candidate and on each question shall be certified as the result of the primary or election in that precinct.

If an emergency should arise due to the malfunction of the voting equipment, the county clerk shall provide backup voting equipment, or paper ballots for use at the precinct and a ballot box in which to deposit the voted ballots. The ballot box shall be locked with two (2) locks and the judges of the precinct shall each hold the key to one (1) lock. At the close of voting, the paper ballots shall be counted at the precinct or a central counting center and added to the votes cast using voting equipment. The aggregate of these votes shall be certified as the result of the election in that precinct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 35; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 6; 1990, ch. 48, § 26, effective July 13, 1990; 2021 ch. 197, § 27, effective June 29, 2021.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where, due to a multiplicity of city elections filed
for in a single election year within a county, the county has an insufficient
number of voting machines, the county board of elections and the county clerk
may determine that an emergency exists authorizing the use of paper ballots.

OAG 75-610

.

There is no requirement that the words “absent”
or “special” be printed on ballots mailed to absentee and disabled
voters; therefore one type of paper ballot can be used both as an absent ballot
and as an emergency ballot.

OAG 76-213

.

A county clerk is not required to have special ballots,
ballot boxes and booths prepared for each election since a reserve voting
machine is sufficient under subsection (2) of this section, which clearly
provides that if an emergency arises due to the malfunction of the voting
machine, the clerk has the alternative of either providing a backup voting
machine or special ballots.

OAG 81-284

.

117.225.
When proof of voter’s identification is required — Voter’s signature — Use of original registration forms to compare signature — Voting supplemental paper ballot.

Any person desiring to vote on election day shall give his or her name and address to the clerk of the election and shall provide proof of identification as defined in KRS

117.001

.

A voter who votes in person at a precinct polling place that is located at a state-licensed care facility where the voter resides is not required to provide proof of identification, as defined in KRS

117.001

, before voting in a primary or an election.

If the voter’s name is listed on the precinct list furnished by the State Board of Elections as provided in KRS

117.025

, the voter provides proof of identification, the voter is exempt pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, or the voter otherwise satisfies the requirements of KRS

117.228

, and if no challenge is made, then he or she shall sign his or her name on the precinct list in the space opposite his or her printed name. The voter’s signature shall constitute the voter’s verification that the voter is a properly registered and qualified voter. The voter shall then retire alone to cast his or her vote on the ballot provided. The county board of elections may provide to each precinct the original registration form of each voter entitled to vote in that precinct. These forms shall be used to compare signatures in those precincts to which the forms are provided.

If supplemental paper ballots are used, as provided in KRS

118.215

, after voting using the voting equipment, the voter shall take the supplemental paper ballot with the stub intact and retire alone to the voting booth provided for voting paper ballots. After voting the supplemental paper ballot, the voter shall remove the numbered stub, hand the stub to an election officer and deposit the voted supplemental paper ballot in the locked supplemental paper ballot box in the presence of a precinct election officer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 36; 1976, ch. 199, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 7; 1978, ch. 384, § 561, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 33, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2020 ch. 89, § 15, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 28, effective June 29, 2021.

117.227.
Confirmation of voter’s identity.

Except as otherwise provided, election officers shall confirm the identity of each voter by proof of identification as defined in KRS

117.001

. The election officer confirming the identity shall sign the precinct voter roster and list the method of proof of identification.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 341, § 9, effective July 15, 1988; 2002, ch. 10, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2016 ch. 62, § 7, effective July 15, 2016; 2020 ch. 89, § 16, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 30, effective June 29, 2021.

117.228.
Procedure for casting ballot if voter is unable to provide proof of identification.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, on the day of a primary, an election, or during in-person absentee voting, if a voter is unable to provide proof of identification as required under KRS

117.225

, and as defined under KRS

117.001

, a voter may cast a ballot if the individual:

Is eligible to vote under KRS

116.025

;

Is entitled to vote in that precinct; and

In the presence of the election officer, executes a voter’s affirmation, on a form prescribed and furnished by the State Board of Elections pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A, affirming:

The voter is a citizen of the United States;

The voter’s date of birth to the best of the voter’s knowledge and belief;

The voter is qualified to vote in this precinct under KRS

116.025

;

The voter’s name, and that the voter is generally known by that name, or the name is as stated on his or her voter registration card;

The voter has not voted and will not vote in any other precinct;

The voter’s current residential address, including the street address number and, if different from the voter’s current address, the voter’s residential address prior to the close of the registration books under KRS

116.045

, and the date the voter moved;

The voter understands that making a false statement on the affirmation is punishable under penalties of perjury; and

The voter has one (1) of the following impediments to procure proof of identification as defined in KRS

117.001

:

Lack of transportation;

Inability to obtain his or her birth certificate or other documents needed to show proof of identification;

Work schedule;

Lost or stolen identification;

Disability or illness;

Family responsibilities;

The proof of identification has been applied for, but not yet received; or

The voter has a religious objection to being photographed.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, to cast a ballot, the voter who is unable to provide proof of identification shall provide to an election officer:

The voter’s Social Security Card;

Any identification card issued by a county in this state which has the name of the voter stated and has been approved in writing by the State Board of Elections pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A;

Any identification card with the voter’s photograph and the name of the voter stated;

Any food stamp identification card, electronic benefit transfer card, or supplemental nutrition assistance card, that is issued by this state and has the name of the voter stated; or

A credit or debit card with the name of the voter stated.

After the election officer obtains the affirmation from the voter required by subsection (1) of this section, and after the voter provides the documents under subsection (2) of this section, the voter shall sign the precinct signature roster and shall proceed to cast his or her vote in a ballot completion area.

If the voter is personally known to the election officer, the election officer may execute an election officer affirmation, on a form prescribed and furnished by the State Board of Elections pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A, affirming the voter’s identification as being personally known to him or her. Once the affirmation is executed by the election officer, the voter shall sign the precinct signature roster and shall proceed to cast his or her vote in a ballot completion area. For purposes of this subsection, “personally known” means that the election officer knows the voter’s name and that the voter is a resident of the community.

The voter affirmation and the election officer affirmations executed under this section shall be processed in the same manner as an oath of voter affidavit as prescribed by KRS 117.245(3) and (4).

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 89, § 1, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 31, effective June 29, 2021.

117.229.
Casting of provisional ballot in election for federal office if voter is unable to provide proof of identification.

On the day of a primary, an election, or during in-person absentee voting when a federal elective office is on the ballot, if a voter is unable to provide proof of identification, as required under KRS

117.225

and as defined under KRS

117.001

, or the voter fails to meet the requirements of KRS

117.228

, the voter may cast a provisional ballot for the federal elective office of President, Vice President, United States Senator, and United States House of Representative if the individual conforms to the provisional voting requirements in accordance with the Help America Vote Act of 2002.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 89, § 2, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 32, effective June 29, 2021.